Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1087
Property, defined.

Property shall mean any real estate or personal property, including any vessel, automobile, aircraft, rail car, other vehicle, machinery, building, dock, nursery, orchard, or other place where plants are grown or maintained or the contents of such place.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 16.